District of Columbia statutes.
22-3218.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Company” means a person or enterprise engaged in the generation or distribution of natural gas or electricity.

(2)

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, joint stock company, or other entity.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 118
as added June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 15, 50 DCR 1092

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 13-281, the “Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Property Omnibus Amendment Act of 2002”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-33, March 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 1875).

Editor's Notes

The provisions of D.C. Law 14-310 replaced the provisions of D.C. Law 13-281. D.C. Law 13-281 was ineffective because of a defective effective date clause for Title 22.